Kentucky statutes. TITLE XVI Motor Vehicles
Public Safety Vehicles

189.960.
Right-of-way to public safety vehicle or to pedestrian engaged in work on highway.

The operator of a vehicle shall yield the right-of-way to any public safety vehicle, as defined in KRS 189.910(2), or any pedestrian actually engaged in work upon a highway or within any highway construction or maintenance area indicated by official traffic control devices.

The operator of a vehicle shall yield the right-of-way to any public safety vehicle obviously and actually engaged in work upon a highway whenever such vehicle displays flashing lights meeting the requirements of KRS 189.920(4).

History.

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 46, § 10, effective June 17, 1978; 2011, ch. 59, § 1, effective June 8, 2011.